Maryland, session 2025, HB0839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
11–303.
(d) (1) Subject to § 11–303.2 of this subtitle, a local board may not reject a
provisional ballot except by unanimous vote and in accordance with regulations of the State
Board.
(2) The local board shall reject a provisional ballot if:
(i) pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection, the local board
determines that the individual who cast the provisional ballot is not qualified to vote that
provisional ballot;
(ii) the individual failed to sign the oath on the provisional ballot
application; or
(iii) the local board determines that a provisional ballot is
intentionally marked with an identifying mark that is clearly evident and placed on the
ballot for the purpose of identifying the ballot.
– 1 –

Ch. 391 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) If the intent of the voter with respect to a particular contest is not
clearly demonstrated, the local board shall reject only the vote for that contest.
(4) For the purposes of this section, an individual is qualified to vote the
provisional ballot cast if the local board determines that:
(i) the individual is registered in the State;
(ii) if the provisional ballot was cast because the voter failed to
provide required identification, the individual who cast the provisional ballot has met the
identification requirements established by the State Board; [and]
(iii) if the provisional ballot was cast during a period covered by a
court order or other order extending the time for closing the polls, the order has not been
invalidated by a subsequent court order; AND
(IV) IF THE PROVISIONAL BALLOT WAS CAST BECAUSE THE
VOTER CLAIMED A DIFFERENT POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION FROM THE
POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION ON RECORD FOR THE VOTER, THE VOTER MADE A
SELECTION IN A NONPARTISAN BOARD OF EDUCATION CONTEST ON THE BALLOT.
(e) A local board shall count:
(1) the entire provisional ballot if the address on the provisional ballot
application is within the precinct where the provisional ballot was cast; [or]
(2) only the votes cast by the voter for each candidate or question applicable
to the precinct in which the voter resides, as determined by the address on the provisional
ballot application of the voter; OR
(3) ONLY THE VOTES CAST BY THE VOTER IN A NONPARTISAN BOARD
OF EDUCATION CONTEST IF THE VOTER CAST A PROVISIONAL BALLOT FOR A
DIFFERENT POLITICAL PARTY FROM THE POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION ON
RECORD FOR THE VOTER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –